Washington statutes.
RCW 42.52.170

Giving, paying, loaning, etc., any thing of economic value to state employee.

No person shall give, pay, loan, transfer, or deliver, directly or indirectly, to any other person any thing of economic value believing or having reason to believe that there exist circumstances making the receipt thereof a violation of RCW 42.52.040, 42.52.110, 42.52.120, 42.52.140, or 42.52.150.

[ 1994 c 154 s 117; 1987 c 426 s 5; 1969 ex.s. c 234 s 23. Formerly RCW 42.18.230.]